Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.210

Offender notification and warning.

Any and all law enforcement agencies and personnel, criminal justice attorneys, sentencing judges, and state and local correctional facilities and personnel may, but are not required to, give any and all offenders either written or oral notice, or both, of the sanctions imposed and criminal justice changes regarding armed offenders, including but not limited to the subjects of:

(1) Felony crimes involving any deadly weapon special verdict under *RCW 9.94A.602;

(2) Any and all deadly weapon enhancements under RCW 9.94A.533 (3) or (4), or both, as well as any federal firearm, ammunition, or other deadly weapon enhancements;

(3) Any and all felony crimes requiring the possession, display, or use of any deadly weapon as well as the many increased penalties for these crimes including the creation of theft of a firearm and possessing a stolen firearm;

(4) New prosecuting standards established for filing charges for all crimes involving any deadly weapons;

(5) Removal of good time for any and all deadly weapon enhancements; and

(6) Providing the death penalty for those who commit first degree murder: (a) To join, maintain, or advance membership in an identifiable group; (b) as part of a drive-by shooting; or (c) to avoid prosecution as a persistent offender as defined in RCW 9.94A.030.

[ 2002 c 290 s 23; 1995 c 129 s 18 (Initiative Measure No. 159).]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 9.94A.602 was recodified as RCW 9.94A.825 pursuant to 2009 c 28 s 41.

Effective date—2002 c 290 ss 7-11 and 14-23: See note following RCW 9.94A.515.

Intent—2002 c 290: See note following RCW 9.94A.517.

Findings and intent—Short title—Severability—Captions not law—1995 c 129: See notes following RCW 9.94A.510.